Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.500

Right of entry—Commission or planning staff.

In the performance of their functions and duties, duly authorized members of a commission or planning staff may enter upon any land and make examinations and surveys: PROVIDED, That such entries, examinations and surveys do not damage or interfere with the use of the land by those persons lawfully entitled to the possession thereof.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.500. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 50.]